cs: Použití odstřihovače nití: Háčkování; Křížkový steh; Výšivka; Běžné tvoření; Pletení; Prošívání; Odřezávání overlockem; Šití; Ostatní
ko: 실 절단기 용도: 코바늘 뜨기; 십자수; 자수; 일반 공예; 뜨개질; 퀼팅; 오버록 다듬기; 재봉; 기타
es: Uso/aplicación del cortador de hilo: Crochet; Punto de cruz; Bordado; Manualidades en general; Tejido de punto; Acolchado; Remalladora/recorte overlock; Costura; Otro
hr-HR: Uporaba/primjena rezača konca: Kukičanje; Vezenje križićima; Vezenje; Opći rukotvorinski radovi; Pletenje; Prošivanje (quilting); Obrezivanje (serger/overlock); Šivanje; Ostalo
en: Thread cutter usage/application: Crochet; Cross-stitch; Embroidery; General crafting; Knitting; Quilting; Serger/overlock trimming; Sewing; Other
zh-CN: 剪线器用途: 钩织; 十字绣; 刺绣; 通用手工艺; 针织; 绗缝; 拷边机/包缝机修剪; 缝纫; 其他
de: Verwendungszweck des Fadenschneiders: Häkeln; Kreuzstich; Sticken; Allgemeines Basteln; Stricken; Quilten; Overlock-Zuschnitt; Nähen; Sonstige
nl: Draadsnijder gebruik/toepassing: Haken; Kruissteek; Borduren; Algemeen knutselen; Breien; Quilten; Lockmachine-/overlock-trimmen; Naaien; Overige
fr: Usage du coupe-fil: Crochet; Point de croix; Broderie; Artisanat général; Tricot; Matelassage; Coupe pour surjeteuse; Couture; Autre
ru: Назначение нитеобрезателя: Вязание крючком; Вышивка крестом; Вышивка; Общее рукоделие; Вязание; Квилтинг; Обрезка оверлоком; Шитье; Другое
zh-TW: 剪線器用途/應用: 鉤針編織; 十字繡; 刺繡; 一般工藝; 針織; 絎縫; 拷克/包邊修剪; 縫紉; 其他
sl-SI: Uporaba rezila za sukanec: Kvačkanje; Navzkrižni šiv; Vezenje; Splošno ustvarjanje; Pletenje; Prešivanje; Obrezovanje za overlock/strojno robljenje; Šivanje; Drugo
lt-LT: Siūlų kirpiklio paskirtis: Nėrimas; Siuvinėjimas kryželiu; Siuvinėjimas; Bendrieji rankdarbiai; Mezgimas; Daigstymas; Apmėtymas / overlokas; Siuvimas; Kita
hu: Cérnavágó felhasználása/alkalmazása: Horgolás; Keresztszemes hímzés; Hímzés; Általános kézművesség; Kötés; Foltvarrás; Overlock/tisztázó vágás; Varrás; Egyéb
vi: Công dụng/ứng dụng của dụng cụ cắt ren: Móc len; Thêu chữ thập; Thêu; Thủ công tổng hợp; Đan len; Chần bông; Cắt tỉa mép/vắt sổ; May vá; Khác
pt-PT: Utilização/aplicação do cortador de fios: Crochê; Ponto cruz; Bordado; Artesanato em geral; Tricô; Acolchoamento; Corte serger/overlock; Costura; Outro
ja: スレッドカッター用途: かぎ針編み; クロスステッチ; 刺繍; 一般的な手芸; 編み物; キルティング; ロックミシン用; 裁縫; その他
tr: İplik kesici kullanım amacı: Tığ işi; Kanaviçe; Nakış; Genel el sanatları; Örgü; Kapitone; Overlok kesimi; Dikiş; Diğer
th: ติดตามการใช้งานเครื่องตัด/แอปพลิเคชัน: โครเชต์; ครอสสติตช์; เย็บปักถักร้อย; งานประดิษฐ์ทั่วไป; นิตติ้ง; ควิลต์; จักรโพ้ง/แซกริม; ตัดเย็บ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Použitie/aplikácia rezačky vlákien: Háčkovanie; Krížiková výšivka; Vyšívanie; Všeobecné tvorenie; Pletenie; Prešívanie (Quilting); Zastrihávanie overlockom; Šitie; Iné
nb: Trådkutterbruk: Hekling; Korssting; Broderi; Generelt håndverk; Strikking; Quilting; Overlock-trimming; Søm; Annet
el: Χρήση/εφαρμογή κοπτικού νήματος: Βελονάκι; Σταυροβελονιά; Κέντημα; Γενική χειροτεχνία; Πλέξιμο; Καπιτονέ; Κοπή για κοπτοράπτη/overlock; Ράψιμο; Άλλο
pl: Zastosowanie obcinacza do nici: Szydełkowanie; Haft krzyżykowy; Haftowanie; Ogólne rękodzieło; Dzierganie; Pikowanie; Przycinanie owerlokiem; Szycie; Inne
it: Utilizzo/applicazione del tagliafilo: Uncinetto; Punto croce; Ricamo; Artigianato generale; Maglia; Quilting; Rifilatura tagliacuci/overlock; Cucito; Altro
pt-BR: Cortador de linha uso/aplicação: Crochê; Ponto cruz; Bordado; Artesanato em geral; Tricô; Quilting; Corte de overlock/interlock; Costura; Outros
da: Brug eller anvendelse af trådklipper: Hækling; Korssting; Broderi; Generelt håndværk; Strikning; Quiltning; Trimning med overlocker; Syning; Andet
bg-BG: Предназначение/приложение на ножицата за конци: Плетене на една кука; Кръстат бод; Бродерия; Общи занаяти; Плетене; Куилтинг; Обрязване с оверлог; Шиене; Друго
ro-RO: Utilizare/aplicație a tăietorului de ață: Croșetat; Cusătură în cruce; Broderie; Artizanat general; Tricotat; Quilting; Tăiere pentru surfilat/overlock; Cusut; Altele
fi: Lankaleikkurin käyttö: Virkkaus; Ristipisto; Kirjonta; Yleinen askartelu; Neulonta; Tilkkutyö; Saumaus/yliluotteilu; Ompelu; Muu
sv: Användningsområde för trådskärare: Virkning; Korsstygn; Broderi; Allmänt pyssel; Stickning; Quiltning; Overlock-klippning; Sömnad; Annat